Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 8.
PUBLIC PROCEEDINGS AND

RECORDS

Chapter

91 Administrative Procedure

92 Public Agency Meetings and Records

92E Fair Information Practice (Confidentiality of
Personal

Record)--Repealed

92F Uniform Information Practices Act (Modified)

93 Government Publications

94 Public Archives; Disposal of Records

95 Destroying or Defacing Official
Notices--Repealed

96 The Ombudsman

97 Lobbyists

98 Uniform Electronic Legal Material Act

Cross References

Alternative dispute resolution center, see chapter 613.

Uniform electronic legal material act, see chapter 98.

CHAPTER 91

ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCEDURE

Section

91-1 Definitions

91-2 Public information

91-2.5 Fees for proposed and final rules

91-2.6 Proposed rulemaking actions and rules;
posting on

the lieutenant governor's internet website

91-3 Procedure for adoption, amendment, or
repeal of

rules

91-4 Filing and taking effect of rules

91-4.1 Rulemaking actions; copies in Ramseyer
format

91-4.2 Rule format; publication of index

91-4.3 Price

91-4.4 Form of publication

91-5 Publication of rules

91-6 Petition for adoption, amendment or repeal
of rules

91-7 Declaratory judgment on validity of rules

91-8 Declaratory rulings by agencies

91-8.5 Mediation in contested cases

91-9 Contested cases; notice; hearing; records

91-9.5 Notification of hearing; service

91-10 Rules of evidence; official notice

91-11 Examination of evidence by agency

91-12 Decisions and orders

91-13 Consultation by officials of agency

91-13.1 Administrative review of denial or refusal
to issue

license or certificate of registration

91-13.5 Maximum time period for business or

development-related permits, licenses, or

approvals; automatic approval; extensions

91-14 Judicial review of contested cases

91-15 Appeals

91-16 Severability

91-17 Federal aid

91-18 Short title

Note

Judiciary report to 2019 legislature on change in judicial
proceedings made by L 2016, c 48. L 2016, c 48, §11.

Cross References

Small business regulatory flexibility act, see chapter 201M.

Uniform electronic legal material act, see chapter 98.

Attorney General Opinions

Because this chapter provides for a decision in a contested
case to be rendered by an agency, a decision rendered by an official who is not
within that agency would be the exception and not the rule. This chapter does
not require a hearings officer from outside the department for administrative
hearings. Att. Gen. Op. 98-6.

Law Journals and Reviews

Sandy Beach Defense Fund v. City and County of Honolulu:
The Sufficiency of Legislative Hearings in an Administrative Setting. 12 UH L.
Rev. 499.

The Lum Court, Land Use, and the Environment: A Survey of
Hawai‘i Case Law 1983 to 1991. 14 UH L. Rev. 119.

Residential Use of Hawai‘i's Conservation District. 14 UH L.
Rev. 633.

Case Notes

Statutory authority is necessary for administrative body to
reconsider prior quasi-judicial decisions on its own initiative. 54 H. 621,
513 P.2d 1001.

Under doctrine of necessity, official otherwise disqualified
can act if jurisdiction is exclusive and substitution is not provided. 54 H.
621, 513 P.2d 1001.

University rules do not have force of law unless Hawaii administrative procedure act is complied with. 56 H. 680, 548 P.2d 253.

Rehearings before administrative bodies are addressed to
their own discretion and only the clearest abuse of discretion could sustain an
exception to rule. 60 H. 166, 590 P.2d 524.

Where health department did not have rules adopted under this
chapter governing the standards of emissions of hydrogen sulfide into the air
as required by §342B-32 (1991) at the time geothermal well developer was issued
permit, department was required to refuse the issuance of the permit. 73 H. 56,
828 P.2d 801.

Department did not violate Hawaii administrative procedure
act when it circulated a memorandum interpreting "sole source"
provisions of Hawaii purchasing law to other state agencies. 76 H. 332, 876
P.2d 1300.

Giving precedential effect to prior commission decisions does
not constitute rule-making. 81 H. 459, 918 P.2d 561.

Public utilities commission did not violate Hawaii
administrative procedure act by not promulgating rules to establish when
transmission lines will be placed underground. 81 H. 459, 918 P.2d 561.

Public utilities commission's reliance on adjudication to
develop underground transmission line policy not abuse of discretion where
commission did not circumvent requirements of Hawaii administrative procedure
act and appellants did not suffer undue hardship relying on past commission
policy. 81 H. 459, 918 P.2d 561.

A water management area designation is not the product of a contested
case hearing, under this chapter, from which a direct appeal to the supreme
court may be brought under §174C-60. 83 H. 484, 927 P.2d 1367.

Where administrative rules failed to set forth the method by
which department determined general assistance amounts, and the method used by
department to determine amounts was adopted without compliance with this
chapter, administrative rules contravened statutory mandate of §346-71(f)
(1996) and were thus void and unenforceable. 88 H. 307, 966 P.2d 619.

Where a public hearing pertaining to the issuance of a liquor
license was statutorily required under §§281-52 and 281-57, and petitioner's
legal rights, duties, and privileges were determined based on the public
hearing regarding the decision to grant or deny a liquor license to petitioner,
the public hearing was a "contested case" hearing governed by this
chapter; thus, (1) petitioner was entitled to judicial review under §91-14, (2)
§91-11 applied to proceedings on petitioner's application for liquor license,
and (3) the liquor commission did not comply with §91-11. 118 H. 320, 189 P.3d
432.

Planning and permitting department's policy of refusing to
publicly disclose developer's engineering reports prior to their approval
constituted a "rule"; as this policy was not "published or made
available for public inspection" nor did plaintiff have actual knowledge
of the policy prior to its initial request for the reports, department did not
comply with this chapter and was proscribed from invoking this policy; thus,
department violated this chapter by refusing to publicly disclose any
unaccepted engineering reports and written comments, and all of department's
files, including developer's file, were public records that could be examined
upon request. 119 H. 90, 194 P.3d 531.

Right to appeal from administrative agency's decision is
limited by this chapter. 9 H. App. 298, 837 P.2d 311.

Section 52D-8 provides officers with a constitutionally
protected property interest – the right to legal representation for acting
within the scope of their duty; due process thus entitles an officer to a
contested case hearing under this chapter before an officer can be deprived of
this interest. 89 H. 221 (App.), 971 P.2d 310.

In the context of parole hearings, the Hawaii paroling
authority does not "adjudicate contested cases" because a Hawaii
paroling authority parole proceeding is not a "contested case" as
defined under this chapter. 93 H. 298 (App.), 1 P.3d 768.

Since the addition of two extra hunting days to each week of
the hunting season concerned "conditions for entry into game management
areas, and public hunting areas designated by the department of land and
natural resources" and "open seasons" for hunting, the express
language of §183D-3 mandated that in order to add the two weekdays for bird
hunting, the department had to amend Hawaii administrative rule 13-122-4
pursuant to this chapter. 117 H. 16 (App.), 175 P.3d 126.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next